Florida, session 2026, HB643.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subsection (4) of section
741.31, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
741.31 Violation of an injunction for protection against
domestic violence.—
(4)
(c) A person who has one two or more prior convictions for
any assault, battery, or violation of an injunction or foreign
protection order, and who subsequently commits a violation of
any injunction or foreign protection order against the same
victim, commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as
provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083 or s. 775.084. A person
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb643-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 643 2026
convicted of violating this paragraph must be sentenced to a
minimum of 10 days in the county jail for each violation, unless
the court sentences the person to a nonsuspended period of
incarceration in a state correctional facility. For purposes of
this paragraph, the term "conviction" means a determination of
guilt which is the result of a plea or a trial, regardless of
whether adjudication is withheld or a plea of nolo contendere is
entered.
Section 2. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb643-01-c1